District of Columbia statutes.
28-4203

Penalty.

A civil fine, penalty, or fee may be imposed as a sanction for an infraction of the provisions of this act [chapter], or any rule promulgated pursuant to this act, in accordance with Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-183, § 2(b), 39 DCR 8206
1981 Ed., § 28-4203.